Idaho, session 2025, H0247.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Legislative Branch the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and
expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026:
FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING
COSTS EXPENDITURES TOTAL
LEGISLATIVE BRANCH:
I. LEGISLATIVE SERVICES OFFICE:
FROM:
General
Fund $7,993,300 $1,269,500 $9,262,800
TechnologyInfrastructureStabilization
Fund 125,300 15,000 140,300
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 116,000 94,000 210,000
LegislativeCapitolFacilities
Fund 440,000 440,000
Professional Services
Fund 1,730,700 103,000 1,833,700
TOTAL $9,965,300 $1,921,500 $11,886,800


FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING
COSTS EXPENDITURES TOTAL
II. OFFICE OF PERFORMANCE EVALUATIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,056,000 $73,600 $1,129,600
GRAND TOTAL $11,021,300 $1,995,100 $13,016,400
SECTION 2. EXEMPTIONS FROM EXPENSE CLASS TRANSFER LIMITATIONS. The
Legislative Services Office and Office of Performance Evaluations are
hereby exempted from the provisions of Section 67-3511(1) and (3), Idaho
Code, allowing unlimited transfers between expense classes for all moneys
appropriated to them for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
Legislative appropriations shall not be transferred from one fund to another
fund unless expressly approved by the Legislature.
SECTION 3. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE ARPA STATE FISCAL RECOV-
ERY FUND. There is hereby reappropriated to the Legislative Services Office
any unexpended and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to
the Legislative Services Office from the ARPA State Fiscal Recovery Fund for
fiscal year 2025 to be used for nonrecurring expenditures for the period July
1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. The Office of the State Controller shall con-
firm the reappropriation amount, by fund, expense class, and program, with
the Legislative Services Office prior to processing the reappropriation au-
thorized herein.
SECTION 4. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.